Rhode Island statutes. Title 16 Education
Chapter 84 Public Higher Education Academic Excellence and Student Access Endowment Incentive Program
[See Title 16 Chapter 97 — The Rhode Island Board of Education Act]

16-84-1.
Legislative findings.

The legislature recognizes that it is clearly in the public interest for the University of Rhode Island, Rhode Island College and the Community College of Rhode Island to seek private funding in support of initiatives which promote academic excellence and educational access. The legislature further finds that the creation of endowed academic chairs enhances the ability of Rhode Island’s three (3) public institutions of higher education to offer quality instruction and that additional scholarship funding will provide opportunities for students to pursue their educational and occupational goals. It is, therefore, declared to be the policy of the state to encourage private fundraising for these purposes by the University of Rhode Island, Rhode Island College and the Community College of Rhode Island and to assist such fundraising through a matching program to be known as the public higher education academic excellence and student access endowment incentive program.

This program shall not result in direct or indirect reductions in the state’s appropriation to the board of governors for higher education.

History of Section.

P.L. 2005, ch. 252, § 1; P.L. 2005, ch. 259, § 1; P.L. 2013, ch. 501, § 84.

16-84-2.
The University of Rhode Island.

Subject to appropriation, the state of Rhode Island may contribute funds to the University of Rhode Island Foundation in an amount necessary to match private donations for the purposes listed below. Subject to appropriation, the state may contribute an amount not to exceed one dollar ($1.00) for every two dollars ($2.00) or one dollar ($1.00) for such greater dollars as may be established by the board of governors for higher education, privately contributed to the University of Rhode Island or the University of Rhode Island Foundation for the creation of new academic chairs, the support of existing academic chairs, other educational enhancements and capital infrastructure investments; provided, that the maximum total contributions from the state to the University of Rhode Island Foundation shall be five million dollars ($5,000,000). Appropriations of Rhode Island capital plan funds shall be considered matching funds for the purposes of this section. Any contributions made to the University of Rhode Island Foundation for these purposes shall be reported to the board of governors for higher education which shall verify their eligibility for this matching program.

History of Section.

P.L. 2005, ch. 252, § 1; P.L. 2005, ch. 259, § 1.

16-84-3.
Rhode Island College.

Subject to appropriation, the state of Rhode Island may contribute funds to Rhode Island College Foundation in an amount necessary to match private donations for the purposes listed below. Subject to appropriation, the state may contribute an amount not to exceed one dollar ($1.00) for every two dollars ($2.00) or one dollar ($1.00) for such greater dollars as may be established by the board of governors for higher education, privately contributed to Rhode Island College or the Rhode Island College Foundation for the creation of new academic chairs, the support of existing academic chairs, other educational enhancements, and capital infrastructure investments; provided, that the maximum total contributions from the state to Rhode Island College shall be two million dollars ($2,000,000). Appropriations of Rhode Island capital plan funds shall be considered matching funds for the purposes of this section. Any contributions made to the Rhode Island College Foundation for these purposes shall be reported to the board of governors for higher education which shall verify their eligibility for this matching program.

History of Section.

P.L. 2005, ch. 252, § 1; P.L. 2005, ch. 259, § 1.

16-84-4.
Community College of Rhode Island.

Subject to appropriation, the state of Rhode Island may contribute funds to the Community College of Rhode Island Foundation in an amount necessary to match private donations for the purposes listed below. Subject to appropriation, the state may contribute an amount not to exceed one dollar ($1.00) for every two dollars ($2.00) or one dollar ($1.00) for such greater dollars as may be established by the board of governors for higher education, privately contributed to the Community College of Rhode Island or the Community College of Rhode Island Foundation for the creation of new academic chairs, the support of existing academic chairs, other educational enhancements, and capital infrastructure investments; provided, that the maximum total contributions from the state to the Community College of Rhode Island shall be one million dollars ($1,000,000). Appropriations of Rhode Island capital plan funds shall be considered matching funds for the purposes of this section. Any contributions made to the Community College of Rhode Island College Foundation for these purposes shall be reported to the board of governors for higher education which shall verify their eligibility for this matching program.

History of Section.

P.L. 2005, ch. 252, § 1; P.L. 2005, ch. 259, § 1.

16-84-5.
Matching grants.

Matching grants shall be made only for those contributions made after July 1, 2005.

History of Section.

P.L. 2005, ch. 252, § 1; P.L. 2005, ch. 259, § 1.